California, session 20252026, AB72.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 15564) is added to Part 8.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, to read: CHAPTER 4. Electric Vehicle Economic Opportunity Zone Pilot Program15564. (a) It is the intent of the Legislature that, as Executive Order No. N-79-20 established the goal that 100 percent of in-state sales of new passenger cars and trucks will be zero-emission by 2035, lower income communities will share in the economic benefits of the zero-emission vehicle industry, including electric vehicle manufacturing.(b) (1) Upon appropriation by the Legislature, an Electric Vehicle Economic Opportunity Zone (EVEOZ) for the County of Riverside is hereby established to be administered by the Labor and Workforce Development Agency for the purpose of creating programs to make electric vehicle manufacturing jobs and education more accessible to lower income communities.(2) The agency shall collaborate with the County of Riverside in determining the geographical boundaries of the EVEOZ.(c) The agency may partner with educational institutions best fitted for educational and workforce development programs to develop EVEOZ education and training programs that may include, but are not limited to, any of the following:(1) A fully accredited associate or bachelor’s collegiate electric vehicle manufacturing and engineering program.(2) Workforce development related to electric vehicle and electric vehicle battery manufacturing.(3) Career pathway, education, training, and support programs for electric vehicle manufacturing certification.(4) Career pathway, education, training, and support programs for electric vehicle service technician development.(5) Career pathway, education, training, and support programs for electric vehicle charging station installation and service.(6) Electric vehicle apprenticeship programs.(7) Engineering and manufacturing of the entire electric vehicle including, but not limited to, battery, safety equipment, electronics and computer coding, and other components necessary to electric vehicles.(d) The agency may partner with electric vehicle manufacturing businesses and local and national financial intuitions to develop EVEOZ investment programs that may include, but are not limited to, any of the following:(1) Incentives, including providing business loans, tax credits, and grants, to build, modify, or upgrade electric vehicle manufacturing facilities within the geographical boundaries of the EVEOZ.(2) Hiring programs and corporate subsidies for companies to onboard, train, and retain workers who reside within the geographical boundaries of the EVEOZ.(e) Any EVEOZ program developed pursuant to this section shall prioritize the recruitment and enrollment of workers or students of underprivileged economic status, as determined by the agency, that reside within the geographical boundaries of the EVEOZ.SEC. 2. The Legislature finds and declares that a special statute is necessary and that a general statute cannot be made applicable within the meaning of Section 16 of Article IV of the California Constitution as Executive Order No. N-79-20 mandates the transition of the states automotive sales to be 100 percent zero-emissions vehicles, cultivating the workforce pipeline locally will financially benefit the state and build industry. Establishing an Electric Vehicle Economic Opportunity Zone (EVEOZ) in the County of Riverside would empower the people with economic and engineering skills, help make the transition to zero-emission vehicles more seamless, and would serve as a model for the establishment of future EVEOZs across the state.SEC. 3. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.SECTION 1.Section 2601 is added to the Elections Code, to read:2601.An elections official shall provide a voter with registration or voting notices, forms, instructions, assistance, or other materials or information relating to the electoral process, including ballots, in Bengali if the voter requests it.SEC. 2.If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.